Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Quieting Title, Ejectment, Rights of Occupying Claimants
§ 1-32-213.
Proceedings if report of jury is for occupying claimant.

If the jury reports a
sum in favor of the occupying claimant on the assessment and valuation
of the valuable improvements, deducting therefrom any damages sustained
by waste and the net annual value of the rents and profits which the
occupying claimant has received after the commencement of the action,
the successful claimant or his heirs may either demand of the occupying
claimant the value of the land without the improvements so assessed
and tender a deed of the land to the occupying claimant, or may pay
the occupying claimant the sum allowed by the jury in his favor, within
such reasonable time as the court shall allow.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 651; R.S. 1887, § 2999; R.S. 1899, § 4118; C.S. 1910, § 4978; C.S. 1920, § 6248; R.S. 1931, § 89-3914; C.S. 1945, § 3-7014; W.S. 1957, § 1-970; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-313.

Declaratory judgment. —

Declaratory judgment action seeking to invalidate city's sale of realty, to which persons entitled to reimbursement for improvements were not made parties, could not prejudice the latters' rights. Quackenbush v. Cheyenne, 52 Wyo. 146, 70 P.2d 577,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1937).

Cited

in

Quackenbush v. City of Cheyenne, 52 Wyo. 146, 70 P.2d 577,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1937).

§ 1-32-214.
Writ of possession to issue on payment for improvements.

If the successful claimant,
his heirs or their guardians elect to pay to the occupying claimant
the sum reported in his favor by the jury, a writ of possession shall
issue in favor of the successful claimant, his heirs or their guardians.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 652; R.S. 1887, § 3000; R.S. 1899, § 4119; C.S. 1910, § 4979; C.S. 1920, § 6249; R.S. 1931, § 89-3915; C.S. 1945, § 3-7015; W.S. 1957, § 1-971; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-314.

§ 1-32-215.
Writ of possession to issue if deed tendered and payment refused.

If the successful claimant,
his heirs or their guardians elect to receive the value of the land
without improvements, assessed to be paid by the occupying claimant,
and tender a general warranty deed conveying their adverse or better
title within the time allowed by the court for the payment of money,
and the occupying claimant refuses or neglects to pay the successful
claimant, his heirs or their guardians within the time limited, a
writ of possession shall issue in favor of the successful claimant,
his heirs or their guardians.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 653; R.S. 1887, § 3001; R.S. 1899, § 4120; C.S. 1910, § 4980; C.S. 1920, § 6250; R.S. 1931, § 89-3916; C.S. 1945, § 3-7016; W.S. 1957, § 1-972; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-315.

§ 1-32-216.
Occupying claimant and heirs not to be evicted except as provided
in W.S. 1-32-214 and 1-32-215; right to bring action for title.

The occupying claimant
or his heirs shall not be evicted from possession of the land except
as provided in W.S.

1-32-214

and

1-32-215

where application is made for the value of improvements.
When an election is made by the successful claimant, his heirs or
their guardians to surrender lands under the provisions of W.S.

1-32-207

through

1-32-216

the occupying claimant or his heirs may, at any time
after payment is made, bring an action in the court where judgment
of eviction was obtained, and obtain judgment for the title of the
land if it has not been previously conveyed to the occupant.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 654; R.S. 1887, § 3002; R.S. 1899, § 4121; C.S. 1910, § 4981; C.S. 1920, § 6251; R.S. 1931, § 89-3917; C.S. 1945, § 3-7017; W.S. 1957, § 1-973; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-316.